Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 4. Assessments and Bonds Generally

Cross references. —

As to securities issued by electric and gas corporations, see §§

37-6-101

to

37-6-107

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

64 Am. Jur. 2d Public Securities and Obligations §§ 33 to 383; 70C Am. Jur. 2d Special or Local Assessment § 1 et seq.

64A C.J.S. Municipal Corporations §§ 1645 to 1724.

§ 15-6-401.
How grades
established or altered; cost.

If the notice provided
for in W.S.

15-6-202

, is in whole or in part to establish or alter a grade,
the governing body, after the expiration of giving the notice as provided
in W.S.

15-6-202

, may establish it by ordinance or resolution. The cost
of establishing or altering the grade of any streets, highway, avenue,
road or alley may be paid out of the general funds of the city or
town or may be specially assessed.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 345; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-345; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “W.S.

15-6-202

” for “W.S.

15-6-204

.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 15-6-402.
Assessments; when levied; what to be included generally.

If the contract or contracts for any improvements have been awarded, or the city or town has determined to construct the improvements by the use of its own equipment, labor and materials, or any of them, or avail itself of any state or federal program contributing to the cost of the improvement, the city engineer, either immediately, or at the council’s discretion upon the completion of the improvements, shall levy an assessment upon the property included in the district. The assessment shall include as a part of the cost the contract price, or the estimated costs of construction, together with the expense of engineering, inspection, advertising, levying and collecting assessments and all other charges which the city or town may have incurred or expects to incur in making and financing the improvements, or the portion of the costs designated by the governing body to be defrayed by special assessments.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 346; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-346; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Applicability of provisions. —

First class city which issued sewer bonds under statute authorizing assessments according to area and distance may take preliminary steps and apportion assessments according to area only as provided by later act applicable to all municipalities. Henning v. Casper, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1936).

Sewer assessments and bonds issued in substantial compliance with essential provisions of law authorizing construction of sewers by first class cities were valid though levied and issued pursuant to later act respecting improvements by all municipalities. Henning v. Consolidated Bldg. & Loan Co., 50 Wyo. 315, 62 P.2d 540,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1936).

Assessment was not void because some property in improvement district was not assessed.

Bass v. Casper, 28 Wyo. 387, 205 P. 1008,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 420, 208 P. 439 (Wyo. 1922).

Preparation of rolls by engineer not city engineer. —

Whether or not under §

15-6-101

, construed liberally as provided by § 15-6-105(b), any engineer employed by the city may prepare assessment roll, an assessment confirmed by the council is not void because the city engineer did not prepare the roll as provided by this section, in view of §

15-6-441

, providing that it shall be no objection to the validity of an assessment that it was made by an unauthorized officer or person if confirmed by the city authorities. Bass v. Casper, 28 Wyo. 387, 205 P. 1008,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 420, 208 P. 439 (Wyo. 1922).

§ 15-6-403.
Assessments; included costs.

If any authorized local improvement is ordered, there shall be included in the cost and expense thereof to be assessed against the property specially benefited and included in the district created to pay all or any part thereof, the cost of:

That portion of the improvement included within the limits of any street intersection space or spaces;

Inspection, tests, materials or work and of all engineering and surveying necessary for the improvement done under the direction of the city or town engineer;

Ascertaining the ownership of the lots or parcels of land included in the assessment district;

Advertising, mailing and publishing all notices; and

All accounting and clerical labor, books and blanks expended or used by the city or town comptroller and the city or town treasurer in connection with the improvements.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 347; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-347; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Sewer assessments and bonds issued in substantial compliance

with essential provisions of law authorizing construction of sewers by first class cities were valid though levied and issued pursuant to later act respecting improvements by all municipalities. Henning v. Consolidated Bldg. & Loan Co., 50 Wyo. 315, 62 P.2d 540,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1936).

§ 15-6-404.
Assessments; property included in district; methods of computation; combining improvements; ordinances and resolutions.

The assessment district shall include all the property benefited by the improvement or improvements as determined by the governing body, including municipal and other public property, except that of the United States government or any agency, instrumentality or corporation thereof in the absence of the consent of congress. If the improvement district includes unplatted or undivided land, the distance back from the improvement for computing assessments and fixing the assessment lien shall be the same as the distance back in the immediately adjoining platted area.

Assessments shall be computed by one (1) or more of the following methods:

Each one-half (1/2) block or fraction thereof within the district contiguous to each street, alley, avenue, boulevard or parkway in or along which the improvement or improvements are to be made shall be divided, irrespective of number and location of lots, into three (3) equal subdivisions parallel to the street, alley, avenue, boulevard or parkway to be improved. The subdivisions shall be numbered one (1), two (2) and three (3) respectively, beginning next to the street, alley, avenue, boulevard or parkway. The total assessment for each one-half (1/2) block or fraction thereof abutting on either side of each street, alley, avenue, boulevard or parkway to be improved, as fixed by the governing body, shall be apportioned as follows:

Subdivision number one (1), sixty percent (60%);

Subdivision number two (2), thirty percent (30%);

Subdivision number three (3), ten percent (10%).

Each one-half (1/2) block contiguous to each street, alley, avenue, boulevard or parkway in or along which the improvement or improvements are to be made shall be assessed on an area basis, so that the assessment against each piece of property assessed shall be in the proportion that the square footage of that piece of property bears to the total square footage of the assessable property within the one-half (1/2) block;

Each piece of property abutting on the street, alley, avenue, boulevard or parkway in or along which the improvement or improvements are to be made shall be assessed on a lineal foot basis so that the total assessment against each piece of a property shall be in the proportion that the abutting lineal footage of that piece of property bears to the total abutting lineal footage of the property to be assessed for the same improvement or improvements;

Each piece of property which the governing body reasonably determines to be benefited by the proposed improvement, regardless of whether the improvement is located in and along a street, alley, avenue, boulevard or parkway, and regardless of whether the property lies within the one-half (1/2) block abutting the improvement, shall be assessed on an area basis, or lineal foot basis, or any other uniform basis so that property similarly benefited will be similarly assessed. Regardless of the method or methods of computation selected by the governing body, and notwithstanding the provisions made for computation to the center of the block or within the one-half (1/2) block, the assessment may be levied and the assessment lien thereby made to attach, upon all of a piece of benefited property so as to avoid the imposition of a lien upon a part of a subdivided lot or parcel under common ownership and use. In the case of any irregular-shaped or nonuniform block or lot, tract, parcel of land or other unit of property to be assessed, an appropriate adjustment may be made, so that the assessment there against is in proportion to the benefits derived.

More than one (1) improvement may be combined in a single local improvement district when the governing body determines that the combination is both efficient and economical. If the combination of improvements are separate and distinct by reason of substantial difference in their character or location, or otherwise, the estimated costs of each improvement shall be segregated for the levy of assessments and an equitable share of the incidental costs allocated to each improvement. In the absence of arbitrary or unreasonable abuse of discretion, its determination of the portion of the project constituting a separate improvement for purposes of segregation is conclusive.

Each city and town may adopt all ordinances and resolutions necessary to levy and collect the special assessment and providing for the manner of sale, redemption and conveyance of lands sold for nonpayment of special assessments.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 348; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-348; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

deleted “and” at the end of (c), and made a related change.

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Relation to other provision. —

Section

15-6-103

and this section are not inconsistent. The former section cannot be said to control the latter. Appeal of Chicago & N. W. R.R., 70 Wyo. 84, 246 P.2d 789,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1952).

Authority to levy assessments well established. —

The judicial decisions on legislation authorizing special assessments have generally become so crystallized that it would seem to be rather late in the day to question their authority. Marion v. Lander, 394 P.2d 910,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1964), cert. denied, 380 U.S. 925, 85 S. Ct. 929, 13 L. Ed. 2d 810, 1965 U.S. LEXIS 1878 (U.S. 1965), reh'g denied, 380 U.S. 989, 85 S. Ct. 1352, 14 L. Ed. 2d 283 (U.S. 1965).

Branch of taxing power. —

The authority of the city council to require the property specially benefited to bear the cost of local improvements is a branch of the taxing power, or included within it. Mealey v. Laramie, 472 P.2d 787,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1970).

Means of affecting tax measure. —

A tax measure will not be affected by any means other than a clear, definite and unambiguous statement of the legislative authority. Mealey v. Laramie, 472 P.2d 787,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1970).

Section provides alternative methods of allocation.

Marion v. Lander, 394 P.2d 910,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1964), cert. denied, 380 U.S. 925, 85 S. Ct. 929, 13 L. Ed. 2d 810, 1965 U.S. LEXIS 1878 (U.S. 1965), reh'g denied, 380 U.S. 989, 85 S. Ct. 1352, 14 L. Ed. 2d 283 (U.S. 1965).

Utilization of methods. —

Whatever method, or combination of methods, is utilized results prima facie in an equal and uniform allocation. Marion v. Lander, 394 P.2d 910,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1964), cert. denied, 380 U.S. 925, 85 S. Ct. 929, 13 L. Ed. 2d 810, 1965 U.S. LEXIS 1878 (U.S. 1965), reh'g denied, 380 U.S. 989, 85 S. Ct. 1352, 14 L. Ed. 2d 283 (U.S. 1965).

City not required to consider tax valuations in fixing assessments.—

Even assuming that the assessed valuation of certain of the properties for ad valorem tax purposes was properly before the court, there is no requirement that compels the city to take such matters into consideration in fixing and determining the assessment of special benefits. Marion v. Lander, 394 P.2d 910,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1964), cert. denied, 380 U.S. 925, 85 S. Ct. 929, 13 L. Ed. 2d 810, 1965 U.S. LEXIS 1878 (U.S. 1965), reh'g denied, 380 U.S. 989, 85 S. Ct. 1352, 14 L. Ed. 2d 283 (U.S. 1965).

And property assessable despite contention no special benefitconferred. —

The right-of-way of a railway company is assessable for street improvements under this section, notwithstanding the contention that no special benefits are conferred on the railway company by the improvements. Appeal of Chicago & N. W. R.R., 70 Wyo. 84, 246 P.2d 789,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1952).

Assessment was not void because some property in improvement district was not assessed.

Bass v. Casper, 28 Wyo. 387, 205 P. 1008,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 420, 208 P. 439 (Wyo. 1922).

Determination that property benefited conclusive. —

When the legislature, or its duly delegated agent for that purpose, determines that property is benefited and shall be assessed, such determination is well-nigh conclusive. Appeal of Chicago & N. W. R.R., 70 Wyo. 84, 246 P.2d 789,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1952); Marion v. Lander, 394 P.2d 910,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1964), cert. denied, 380 U.S. 925, 85 S. Ct. 929, 13 L. Ed. 2d 810, 1965 U.S. LEXIS 1878 (U.S. 1965), reh'g denied, 380 U.S. 989, 85 S. Ct. 1352, 14 L. Ed. 2d 283 (U.S. 1965).

The determination of the assessing authorities as to what property is benefited, and the extent or value of the benefits, is generally held conclusive, and cannot be questioned except in cases of fraud or manifest mistake. Emery v. Rawlins, 596 P.2d 675,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 420

(Wyo. 1979).

Where no evidence of fraud, arbitrariness or palpable injustice.—

Determination by city council that railroad's right-of-way was benefited by street improvement and was subject to assessment, was conclusive on the supreme court where there was no evidence that determination by city council was due to fraud, arbitrariness or palpable injustice. Chicago & N. W. R.R. v. Riverton, 70 Wyo. 119, 247 P.2d 660 (Wyo. 1952).

Objecting lot owner has burden to show arbitrary or illegal action

on the part of the city; that burden has not been met by merely showing difference in net assessments due. Emery v. Rawlins, 596 P.2d 675,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 420

(Wyo. 1979).

Burden not met. —

A disparity in the assessment is not the result of an arbitrary and capricious method where the city makes an allowance for the work which has been done by or in behalf of the particular lot owner. Emery v. Rawlins, 596 P.2d 675,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 420

(Wyo. 1979).

Where the city council has made the legislative determination that since commercial lots are generally larger than residential, it is proper to permit a greater assessment against them, but in no case shall the benefit be considered as extending beyond the established average depth, such classification is neither arbitrary nor discriminatory. Emery v. Rawlins, 596 P.2d 675,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 420

(Wyo. 1979).

Second assessment of corner lot allowed. —

Mere fact that corner lot has been once assessed for sewer construction along its front street does not necessarily furnish constitutional reason why it may not be subsequently assessed for sewer constructed through the other street upon which it abuts. McGarvey v. Swan, 17 Wyo. 120, 96 P. 697,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1908).

Reassessment of certain property will not be ordered

where the resulting “saving” spread throughout the district would be so small that the doctrine of de minimis must apply. Emery v. Rawlins, 596 P.2d 675,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 420

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 15-6-405.
Assessments; roll; preparation and filing; hearing; notice; action by governing body; objections; amendments; certification.

When an assessment roll for local improvements has been prepared, it shall be filed with the clerk of the city or town. The governing body shall then fix a date for hearing upon the roll before it and direct the clerk to give notice of the time and place of the hearing. Any person may object to the roll in writing and file the objections with the clerk on or before the date of the hearing. At the time and place fixed and at such other times to which the hearing may be continued, the governing body shall sit as a board of equalization to consider the roll. At the hearing or hearings, the governing body will consider the objections or any part thereof, and correct, revise, raise, lower, change or modify the roll or any part thereof, or set it aside and order that the roll assessments be made de novo, in a manner appearing just and equitable, and then proceed to confirm the roll by ordinance. The notice of the hearing shall be published at least twice, by two (2) weekly publications in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or town. However, at least fifteen (15) days must elapse between the date of the first publication and the date fixed for the hearing.

The notice shall also be given by the clerk, or his deputy by deposit of the notice, at least fifteen (15) days prior to the date fixed for hearing, in the United States mails, postage prepaid, as first class mail, addressed to the last known owner or owners of each tract being assessed at their last known addresses. In the absence of fraud the failure to mail any notice does not invalidate any assessment or any proceedings under this chapter. Any list of names or addresses pertaining to any district may be revised from time to time, but it need not be revised more frequently than at twelve (12) month intervals. Any mailing of notice prescribed by this chapter shall be verified by the affidavit or certificate of the person mailing the notice, and the verification shall be retained in the records of the city or town at least until all assessments and bonds pertaining thereto have been paid in full.

All objections to the roll shall state clearly the grounds of objections and unless made within the time and in the manner prescribed are conclusively presumed to have been waived. If any roll is amended so as to raise any assessments or to include omitted property, a new time and place for hearing and a new notice of hearing on the amended roll shall be fixed and given as in the case of an original hearing. However, if any property has been entered originally upon the roll and the assessment upon the property has not been raised, no objections thereto may be considered by the governing body or by any court on appeal, unless they were made in writing at or before the date fixed for the original hearing. When an assessment roll is confirmed, it shall be certified to by the city clerk and transmitted to the city treasurer for collection.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 349; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-349; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Sewer assessments and bonds issued in substantial compliance

with essential provisions of law authorizing construction of sewers by first class cities were valid though levied and issued pursuant to later act respecting improvements by all municipalities. Henning v. Consolidated Bldg. & Loan Co., 50 Wyo. 315, 62 P.2d 540,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1936).

Notice and hearing required by due process. —

Due process requires notice and hearing at some stage of the proceeding in order that owners may question the validity and justness of assessments for special benefits. Marion v. Lander, 394 P.2d 910,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1964), cert. denied, 380 U.S. 925, 85 S. Ct. 929, 13 L. Ed. 2d 810, 1965 U.S. LEXIS 1878 (U.S. 1965), reh'g denied, 380 U.S. 989, 85 S. Ct. 1352, 14 L. Ed. 2d 283 (U.S. 1965).

But section provides due process. —

Where city has set in motion its jurisdiction of the subject matter in proceedings to levy assessments for local improvements, final notice of hearing for confirmation of the assessment required by this section constitutes due process of law. Bass v. Casper, 28 Wyo. 387, 205 P. 1008,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 420, 208 P. 439 (Wyo. 1922).

This section's provisions for notice and hearing upon the assessment roll are sufficient to meet due process requirements, even though the assessment roll is not made up until after the contract for installation and construction of the improvements has been let. Marion v. Lander, 394 P.2d 910,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1964), cert. denied, 380 U.S. 925, 85 S. Ct. 929, 13 L. Ed. 2d 810, 1965 U.S. LEXIS 1878 (U.S. 1965), reh'g denied, 380 U.S. 989, 85 S. Ct. 1352, 14 L. Ed. 2d 283 (U.S. 1965).

Waiver of objections. —

The legislature intended to foreclose court attacks upon the assessment only at to those points which could have been but were not placed before the council. Emery v. Rawlins, 596 P.2d 675,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 420

(Wyo. 1979).

Even if legislature did not intend by §

15-6-408

, making confirmation by the council final and conclusive against all parties not filing objections as required by this section, to make all steps not constitutionally necessary irregularities only on collateral attack, a defect in resolution of intention in not sufficiently stating character and extent of proposed improvement, as required by §

15-6-202

, cannot be taken advantage of in a suit to enjoin collection of assessment, by property owners who filed no objections to the confirmation. Bass v. Casper, 28 Wyo. 387, 205 P. 1008,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 420, 208 P. 439 (Wyo. 1922).

Since this section and §

15-6-408

, with respect to waiver of objections, apply only to persons not filing objections to and not appealing from council's confirmation thereof, §

15-6-441

, declaring assessments valid, though made by unauthorized person, if confirmed by council in good faith without fraud or oppression, applies also to persons not making objections in confirmation proceeding itself, and covers at least specific irregularities therein pointed out. Bass v. Casper, 28 Wyo. 387, 205 P. 1008,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 420, 208 P. 439 (Wyo. 1922) (decided under former similar provisions).

Assessments not subject to collateral attack in absence offraud. —

The provisions of this section are adequate for the purpose of determining and equalizing assessments against the property in the district and, absent fraud, such assessments are not subject to collateral attack. Marion v. Lander, 394 P.2d 910,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1964), cert. denied, 380 U.S. 925, 85 S. Ct. 929, 13 L. Ed. 2d 810, 1965 U.S. LEXIS 1878 (U.S. 1965), reh'g denied, 380 U.S. 989, 85 S. Ct. 1352, 14 L. Ed. 2d 283 (U.S. 1965).

Limitation of actions. —

Holder of improvement bonds need not continuously search municipal records to ascertain whether officers are doing their statutory duty, and limitation against action by him based on treasurer's reduction of assessments does not commence running until he acquires actual notice thereof. Gray v. Thermopolis, 33 F. Supp. 73, 1936 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1104 (D. Wyo. 1936).

Relief may be granted from improper action bearing upon the power of the city agency to act and not even known to the property owner, where the motion appears to have been promptly filed after discovery of the alleged violation. Emery v. Rawlins, 596 P.2d 675,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 420

(Wyo. 1979).

Quoted

in

Mealey v. City of Laramie, 472 P.2d 787,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1970).

§ 15-6-406.
Lien created; priority; filing.

The charge on the respective lots, tracts, parcels of land and other property for the purpose of special assessments, to pay the cost and expense in whole or in part of any improvement authorized in this chapter, when assessed and the assessment roll is confirmed by the governing body, shall be a lien upon the property assessed from the time the assessment roll is placed in the hands of the officer authorized by law to collect the assessment. The lien shall be paramount and superior to any other lien or encumbrance created before or after, except a lien for assessments for general taxes.

In order to have a valid, enforceable lien under this section, a lien statement sworn to before a notarial officer, shall be filed by the claimant with the county clerk of the county in which the assessment district is located. The county clerk shall file the statement and index by date, name of claimant and property owner, and by legal description. The lien statement shall contain the following:

The name and address of the governing body seeking to enforce the lien;

The name and address of the person against whose property the lien is filed; and

The legal description of the property to which the lien attaches.

Special assessment rolls approved prior to July 1, 1989 and still in effect, shall be filed with the county clerk of the county in which the district is located.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 350; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-350; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1989, ch. 185, § 1; 2008, ch. 20, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “notarial officer,” for “notary public” in the introductory language of (b).

Assessments limited to the costs and expenses

of the improvement, and bonds are apparently authorized to be issued in the same amount, though not greater, and the city is not liable for any deficiency subsequently arising. Richardson v. Casper, 48 Wyo. 219, 45 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1935).

No priorities between liens. —

Liens of special assessments levied to pay bonds issued for special improvements, such as grading, paving, sewer, etc., have no priority one over the other, but are of equal rank regardless of the time they were created. Willard v. Morton, 50 Wyo. 72, 59 P.2d 338,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1936).

Limitation of actions. —

Holder of improvement bonds need not continuously search municipal records to ascertain whether municipal officers are doing their statutory duty and limitation against action by him based on treasurer's reduction of assessments does not commence running until he acquires actual notice thereof. Gray v. Thermopolis, 33 F. Supp. 73, 1936 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1104 (D. Wyo. 1936).

Law reviews. —

See “Tax Lien Priority,” 4 Wyo. L.J. 255 (1950).

§ 15-6-407.
Assessments; review of decisions.

The decision of the governing body may be appealed to the district court by filing a written notice of appeal within fifteen (15) days from the date of the governing body’s decision.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 351; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-351; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1985, ch. 209, § 1.

Remedy of owner of bonds payable only from improvement fund upon nonpayment

is to enforce a special assessment by mandamus to compel city officials to reassess. Blanchar v. Casper, 81 F.2d 452, 1936 U.S. App. LEXIS 3462 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1936).

Waiver of objections. —

The legislature intended to foreclose court attacks upon the assessment only as to those points which could have been but were not placed before the council. Emery v. Rawlins, 596 P.2d 675,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 420

(Wyo. 1979).

Objection to inclusion of several streets in one district is not available to property owners who did not object to confirmation of assessment. Bass v. Casper, 28 Wyo. 387, 205 P. 1008,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 420, 208 P. 439 (Wyo. 1922).

Limitation of actions. —

Relief may be granted from improper action bearing upon the power of the city agency to act and not even known to the property owner, where the motion appears to have been promptly filed after discovery of the alleged violation. Emery v. Rawlins, 596 P.2d 675,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 420

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 15-6-408.
Assessments; when proceedings conclusive; when sale enjoinable.

When any assessment roll for local improvements has been confirmed by the governing body, the regularity, validity and correctness of the proceedings relating to the improvement and to the assessment, including the action of the governing body upon the assessment roll and its confirmation, is conclusive in all things upon all parties and cannot in any manner be contested or questioned in any proceedings by any person not filing written objections and not appealing the confirmation of the assessment roll in the manner provided.

No proceeding of any kind may be commenced or prosecuted to defeat or contest:

Any assessment specified in subsection (a) of this section;

The sale of any property to pay the assessment;

Any certificate of delinquency issued therefor;

The foreclosure of any lien issued therefor, except injunction proceedings to prevent the sale of any real estate on the grounds that the property about to be sold does not appear upon the assessment roll; or

That the assessment has been paid.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 352; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-352; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-409.
Assessments; when paid; interest; penalty; collection and enforcement of liens generally.

The city or town, in the ordinance confirming the assessment roll, shall prescribe the time within which the assessment or installments thereof shall be paid and shall provide for the payment and collection of interest thereon at a rate established by ordinance. Assessments or installments thereof, when delinquent, in addition to interest, shall bear a penalty of not more than five percent (5%) as prescribed by general ordinance. Interest and penalty shall be included in and made a part of the assessment lien. All local assessments becoming a lien upon any property in any city or town shall be collected by the treasurer, and all liens shall be enforced in the manner provided. In cities and towns other than cities of the first class, delinquent assessments or delinquent installments thereof shall be certified to the treasurer of the county in which the city or town is located, and he shall enter them upon the general tax rolls and collect them as other general taxes are collected. The county treasurer shall remit to the city treasurer on the tenth of each month all sums so collected.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 353; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-353; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; ch. 48, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to interest rates generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

Cited

in

Collier v. Hilltop Nat'l Bank, 920 P.2d 1241,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 15-6-410.
Assessments; sale of property for delinquency; generally.

If an assessment or any installment thereof is delinquent, the city or town, by general ordinance, may provide for the sale of property described in the local assessment roll for:

The amount of the delinquent assessment or installment, together with penalty and interest accruing to date of sale;

The costs of the sale;

The execution and delivery by the treasurer of the city or town of certificates of sale to the purchaser; and

The execution by the treasurer of an assessment deed to the person entitled.

The treasurer shall give notice of such sales by publishing a notice once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published within the city or town, or if there is none, then in a newspaper of general circulation within the county. The notice shall contain a list of all property upon which assessments are delinquent with the amount of the assessments, interest, penalties and costs to date of sale, including the cost of advertising the sale, together with the names of the owners of the property, or the words “unknown owners,” as they appear upon the assessment roll. The notice shall include, in addition to the legal description of the property, the street address for the property used by the United States postal service when available, or the street address used by the county or municipality if available. The notice shall specify the time and place of sale and that the property described will be sold to satisfy the assessments, interest, penalties and costs due upon it. All such sales shall be made between the hours of 10:00 a.m. and 4:00 p.m. and shall take place at the front door of the building in which the governing body holds its sessions. The sale shall be continued from day to day, omitting Sundays and legal holidays, until all the property described in the assessment roll on which any assessment or installment is delinquent and unpaid is sold. All sales are public, and each lot, tract or parcel of land, or other property shall be sold separately in the order in which they appear upon the assessment roll.

All lots, tracts and parcels of land and other property sold for delinquent and unpaid local assessments shall be sold to the first person at the sale offering to pay the amount due on the lot, tract or parcel of land or other property. If there is no bidder for any lot, tract or parcel of land, or other property, for a sum sufficient to pay the delinquent and unpaid assessment thereon, or installment thereof, together with interest, penalty and costs, the treasurer shall strike it off to the city or town for the whole amount which he is required to collect by the sale. If any bidder to whom any property is stricken off at the sale does not pay the assessment, interest, penalty and costs before 10:00 a.m. of the day following the sale, the property must then be resold, or if the assessment sale is closed, the property is deemed to have been sold to the city or town, and a certificate of sale shall be issued to the city or town therefor.

Any city or town may enter into an agreement with any person to provide that the person, in case of a sale under this section of the lots, tracts or parcels specified in the agreement, shall bid an amount at least equal to the sum of the total unpaid assessment, including delinquencies, and penalty, interest and costs to date of sale for each of the lots, tracts or parcels specified in the agreement.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 354; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-354; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1, ch. 48, § 1; 1996, ch. 70, § 2.

Bondholder may collect assessment if city does not. —

The city may be general ordinance provide for enforcement of assessments and sale of property subject thereto, but it is not obligatory upon it to do so, nor is it obligatory upon city to collect the assessments and if it fails, neglects or refuses to pay the bonds or promptly to collect any assessments when due, bond owner may do so. Richardson v. Casper, 48 Wyo. 219, 45 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1935).

City not liable in tort for failure to collect. —

The city is not liable in tort for its failure to make any effort to collect special assessments levied to pay special improvement bonds, as the statute gives bondholder the right to collect such assessments. Richardson v. Casper, 48 Wyo. 219, 45 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1935).

In tort action against city for failure to perform its alleged duties in collecting and applying special assessments to the payment of special improvement bonds, city was not liable as bonds contained statutory limitation of liability, and also gave holders right to enforce the assessments, no duty being imposed upon the city to collect and apply the special assessments. Richardson v. Casper, 48 Wyo. 219, 45 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1935).

§ 15-6-411.
Assessments; sale of property; statement returned.

Within fifteen (15) days after the completion of the sale of all property described in the assessment rolls and authorized to be sold, the treasurer shall return to the comptroller, or other officer by whom the warrant was issued for the sale, a statement indicating his action thereon and showing all the property he sold, to whom sold and the sums paid for each.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 355; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-355; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-412.
Assessments; sale of property; certificates; private purchaser; contents; city or town; sale.

After receiving the amount of the assessment, penalty, interest, costs and charges, the treasurer shall make out a certificate, dated on the day of sale, stating (when known) the name of the owner as given on the assessment roll, a description of the land or other property sold, the amount paid therefor, the name of the purchaser, that it was sold for the assessment, giving the names of the streets, or other brief designation of the improvement for which the assessment was made, and specifying that the purchaser is entitled to a deed two (2) years from the date of sale, unless the property is redeemed. The certificate shall be signed by the treasurer and delivered to the purchaser who shall record it in the county clerk’s office in the county in which the lands or other property is situated within three (3) months from the date thereof. If not recorded within that time, the lien thereof shall be postponed to claims of subsequent purchasers and encumbrancers for value and in good faith who become purchasers and encumbrancers while it is unrecorded.

The city or town comptroller, if there is one, and if not then the city or town clerk, is the custodian of all certificates for property sold to the city or town. At any time within two (2) years from the date of a certificate and before redemption of the property, he shall sell and transfer any certificate to any person who presents to him the treasurer’s receipt evidencing payment of the amount for which the property described was stricken off to the city, with interest subsequently accrued to the date of payment. The comptroller or clerk, if authorized by the governing body, may sell and transfer any certificate in like manner after the expiration of two (2) years from the date of the certificate.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 356; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-356; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cited

in

Collier v. Hilltop Nat'l Bank, 920 P.2d 1241,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 15-6-413.
Assessments; fund created; use.

All monies collected by the treasurer upon any assessments under this chapter shall be kept as a separate fund to be known as “local improvement fund, district no.
. . . . . ,” or by any other appropriate designation approved by the governing body. The fund shall be used for the retirement of any obligation or debt created in the construction of the improvement.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 357; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-357; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.